pt-PT: Formato de jogo compatível: Compatibilidade com versões anteriores; Apenas download digital; Disco físico; Consola virtual; Outro
ko: 호환 가능한 게임 형식: 하위 호환성; 디지털 다운로드 전용; 실제 디스크; 가상 콘솔; 기타
sl-SI: Združljiv format igre: Združljivost za nazaj; Samo digitalni prenos; Fizični disk; Virtualna konzola; Drugo
en: Compatible game format: Backward compatibility; Digital download only; Physical disc; Virtual console; Other
it: Formato di gioco compatibile: Retrocompatibilità; Solo download digitale; Disco fisico; Consolle virtuale; Altro
hr-HR: Kompatibilan format igre: Povratna kompatibilnost; Samo digitalno preuzimanje; Fizički disk; Virtualna konzola; Ostalo
pt-BR: Formato de jogo compatível: Compatibilidade com versões anteriores; Apenas downloads digitais; Disco físico; Console virtual; Outro
el: Συμβατή μορφή παιχνιδιού: Ανάδρομη συμβατότητα; Μόνο ψηφιακή λήψη; Φυσικός δίσκος; Εικονική κονσόλα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Format de joc compatibil: Compatibilitate cu o versiune anterioară; Doar descărcare digitală; Disc fizic; Consolă virtuală; Altele
pl: Zgodny format gry: Zgodność wsteczna; Tylko pobieranie cyfrowe; Dysk fizyczny; Konsola wirtualna; Inne
de: Kompatibles Spielformat: Rückwärtskompatibilität; Ausschließlich digitaler Download; Physische Festplatte; Virtuelle Konsole; Sonstiges
ja: 互換性のあるゲームフォーマット: 下位互換性; デジタルダウンロードのみ; 物理ディスク; 仮想コンソール; その他
vi: Định dạng trò chơi tương thích: Tương thích ngược; Chỉ nội dung tải xuống kỹ thuật số; Đĩa vật lý; Virtual Console; Khác
zh-CN: 适用游戏格式: 后向兼容性; 仅限数字化下载; 物理光盘; 虚拟控制台; 其他
th: รูปแบบเกมที่รองรับ: ความเข้ากันได้กับรุ่นก่อนหน้า; การดาวน์โหลดแบบดิจิทัลเท่านั้น; แผ่น; คอนโซลเสมือน; อื่นๆ
cs: Kompatibilní herní formát: Zpětná kompatibilita; Pouze digitální stahování; Fyzický disk; Virtuální konzole; Jiné
sk-SK: Kompatibilný formát hry: Spätná kompatibilita; Iba digitálne sťahovanie; Fyzický disk; Virtuálna konzola; Iné
tr: Uyumlu Oyun Formatı: Geriye dönük uyumluluk; Yalnızca dijital indirme; Fiziksel disk; Sanal konsol; Diğer
nb: Kompatibelt spillformat: Bakoverkompatibilitet; Kun digitale nedlastinger; Fysisk plate; Virtuell konsoll; Annet
lt-LT: Suderinamas žaidimo formatas: Atgalinis suderinamumas; Tik skaitmeninis atsisiuntimais; Fizinis diskas; Virtuali konsolė; Kita
es: Formato de juego compatible: Compatibilidad con versiones anteriores; Solo descargas digitales; Disco físico; Consola virtual; Otros
bg-BG: Съвместим формат на играта: Обратна съвместимост; Само цифрово изтегляне; Физически диск; Виртуална конзола; Други
ru: Поддерживаемый формат игры: Обратная совместимость; Только цифровая загрузка; Физический диск; Виртуальная консоль; Другое
hu: Kompatibilis játékformátum: Előző verziókkal való kompatibilitás; Csak digitális letöltés; Fizikai lemez; Virtuális konzol; Egyéb
sv: Kompatibelt spelformat: Bakåtkompatibilitet; Endast digital nedladdning; Fysisk skiva; Virtuell konsol; Övrigt
fi: Yhteensopiva peliformaatti: Taaksepäin yhteensopiva; Vain digitaalinen lataus; Fyysinen levy; Virtuaalinen konsoli; Muu
nl: Compatibel spelformaat: Achterwaartse compatibiliteit; Enkel digitale downloads; Fysieke schijf; Virtuele console; Andere
da: Kompatibelt spilformat: Bagudkompatibilitet; Kun digital download; Fysisk disk; Virtuel konsol; Andet
zh-TW: 相容遊戲格式: 向後相容性; 數位下載; 實體光碟; 虛擬控制台; 其他
fr: Format de jeu compatible: Rétrocompatibilité; Téléchargements numériques; Disque physique; Console virtuelle; Autre